ko: 바 코팅: 카라멜; 초콜릿; 과일; 허니 글레이즈; 없음; 피넛 버터; 요거트; 기타
zh-CN: 棒体涂层: 焦糖; 巧克力; 水果; 蜂蜜糖衣; 无; 花生酱; 酸奶; 其他
sv: Stångbeläggning: Kola; Choklad; Frukt; Honungsglaze; Ingen; Jordnötssmör; Yoghurt; Övrigt
ro-RO: Acoperirea barei: Caramel; Ciocolată; Fructe; Glazură de miere; Fără; Unt de arahide; Iaurt; Altele
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava tyče: Karamel; Čokoláda; Ovocie; Medová poleva; Žiadna; Arašidové maslo; Jogurt; Iná
bg-BG: Покритие на бара: Карамел; Шоколад; Плод; Медена глазура; Няма; Фъстъчено масло; Йогурт; Друго
cs: Povrchová úprava tyčí: Karamel; Čokoláda; Ovoce; Medová poleva; Žádná; Arašídové máslo; Jogurt; Jiné
pt-PT: Revestimento de barra: Caramelo; Chocolate; Fruta; Cobertura de mel; Nenhum; Manteiga de amendoim; Iogurte; Outro
fi: Patukan pinnoite: Kinuski; Suklaa; Hedelmä; Hunajakuorrutus; Ei mitään; Maapähkinävoi; Jogurtti; Muu
th: สารเคลือบแท่งขนม: คาราเมล; ช็อกโกแลต; ผลไม้; เคลือบน้ำผึ้ง; ไม่มี; เนยถั่ว; โยเกิร์ต; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 桿塗層: 焦糖; 巧克力; 水果; 蜂蜜糖衣; 無; 花生醬; 優格; 其他
sl-SI: Premaz ploščice: Karamela; Čokolada; Sadje; Medena glazura; Brez; Kikirikijevo maslo; Jogurt; Drugo
nl: Barcoating: Karamel; Chocolade; Fruit; Honingglazuur; Geen; Pindakaas; Yoghurt; Overig
el: Επικάλυψη ράβδου: Καραμέλα; Σοκολάτα; Φρούτα; Γλάσο μελιού; Κανένα; Φυστικοβούτυρο; Γιαούρτι; Άλλο
pt-BR: Revestimento da barra: Caramelo; Chocolate; Fruta; Cobertura de mel; Nenhum; Manteiga de amendoim; Iogurte; Outros
pl: Powłoka pręta: Karmel; Czekolada; Owoce; Miodowa glazura; Brak; Masło orzechowe; Jogurt; Inne
hr-HR: Premaz pločice: Karamela; Čokolada; Voće; Glazura od meda; Ništa; Maslac od kikirikija; Jogurt; Ostalo
fr: Enrobage de barres: Caramel; Chocolat; Fruits; Glaçage au miel; Aucun; Beurre de cacahuète; Yaourt; Autre
nb: Stangbelegg: Karamell; Sjokolade; Frukt; Honningsglasur; Ingen; Peanøttsmør; Yoghurt; Annet
vi: Lớp phủ thanh đòn: Caramen; Sô-cô-la; Trái cây; Phủ mật ong; Không có; Bơ đậu phộng; Sữa chua; Khác
da: Barovertræk: Karamel; Chokolade; Frugt; Honningglasering; Ingen; Peanutbutter; Yoghurt; Andet
lt-LT: Batonėlio glazūra: Karamelė; Šokoladas; Vaisiai; Medaus glajus; Nėra; Žemės riešutų sviestas; Jogurtas; Kita
es: Recubrimiento de la barra: Caramelo; Chocolate; Fruta; Glaseado de miel; Ninguno; Mantequilla de maní; Yogur; Otro
en: Bar coating: Caramel; Chocolate; Fruit; Honey glaze; None; Peanut butter; Yogurt; Other
it: Rivestimenti per barre: Caramello; Cioccolato; Frutta; Glassa al miele; Nessuno; Burro di arachidi; Yogurt; Altro
ru: Покрытие батончика: Карамель; Шоколад; Фрукты; Медовая глазурь; Нет; Арахисовая паста; Йогурт; Другое
hu: Rúd bevonata: Karamell; Csokoládé; Gyümölcs; Mézes máz; Nincs; Mogyoróvaj; Joghurt; Egyéb
de: Riegelbeschichtung: Karamell; Schokolade; Frucht; Honigglasur; Keine; Erdnussbutter; Joghurt; Sonstige
ja: バーコーティング: キャラメル; チョコレート; フルーツ; ハニーグレーズ; なし; ピーナッツバター; ヨーグルト; その他
tr: Bar kaplaması: Karamel; Çikolata; Meyve; Ballı sır; Yok; Fıstık ezmesi; Yoğurt; Diğer